Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 7. Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders.

§ 51.5-152.
Powers and duties of the Department with respect to Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders.

The Department shall:

Serve as a referral point for linking families caring for persons with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders with Virginia’s chapters of the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Association;

Provide information, counseling, education, and referral about services and programs, including safe, secure environments as defined in §

63.2-1802

, that may support individuals and families dealing with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders;

Collect and monitor data related to the impact of Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders on Virginians;

Evaluate the needs of individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers, and identify the services, resources, and policies that may be needed to address such needs for individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers;

Recommend strategies for coordination of services and resources among agencies involved in the delivery of services to Virginians with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders;

Monitor development and implementation of the state plan for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers required pursuant to subdivision D 4 of §

51.5-154

; and

Recommend policies, legislation, and funding necessary to implement the state plan for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers required pursuant to subdivision D 4 of §

51.5-154

.

History.

2003, cc. 749, 766, § 2.2-718; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2013, c. 376; 2020, c. 728.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 468, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Health in partnership with the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Commission, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, and the Alzheimer’s Association, shall in its existing, relevant public health outreach programs incorporate information (i) to educate health care providers on the importance of early detection and timely diagnosis of cognitive impairment, validated cognitive assessment tools, the value of a Medicare Annual Wellness visit for cognitive health, and the new Medicare care planning billing code for individuals with cognitive impairment and (ii) to increase understanding and awareness of early warning signs of Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia, the value of early detection and diagnosis, and how to reduce the risk of cognitive decline, particularly among persons in diverse communities who are at greater risk of developing Alzheimer’s disease and other types of dementia.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 376 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 728, in subdivision 2, inserted “education” and “including safe, secure environments as defined in §

63.2-1802

”; and in subdivisions 6 and 7, substituted “needs of individuals” for “needs of patients.”

§ 51.5-153.
Alzheimer’s and Related Diseases Research Award Fund.

There is established a fund to be known as the Alzheimer’s and Related Diseases Research Award Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be administered by the Virginia Center on Aging and the awards shall be made through an awards committee consisting of representatives from the scientific and medical communities and the general public. The awards shall be given annually to scientists in Virginia in order to support research into the causes of Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders, methods of treatment, ways that families can cope with the stresses of the disease, and the impact of the disease on the citizens of the Commonwealth.

History.

2003, cc. 749, 766, § 2.2-719; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

§ 51.5-154.
(Expires July 1, 2023) Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Commission; report.

The Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Commission (the Commission) is established as an advisory commission in the executive branch of state government. The purpose of the entity is to assist people with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers.

The Commission shall consist of 15 nonlegislative citizen members. Members shall be appointed as follows: three members to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; two members to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and 10 members to be appointed by the Governor, of whom seven shall be from among the boards, staffs, and volunteers of the Virginia chapters of the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Association and three shall be from the public at large.Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of four years. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. All members may be reappointed. However, no nonlegislative citizen member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.The Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum. The Commission shall meet at least four times each year. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the voting members so request.

Members shall receive such compensation for the discharge of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department.

The Commission shall have the power and duty to:

Examine the needs of persons with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders, as well as the needs of their caregivers, and ways that state government can most effectively and efficiently assist in meeting those needs;

Develop and promote strategies to encourage brain health and reduce cognitive decline;

Advise the Governor and General Assembly on policy, funding, regulatory, and other issues related to persons suffering from Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers;

Develop the Commonwealth’s plan for meeting the needs of patients with Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and their caregivers, and advocate for such plan;

Submit to the Governor, General Assembly, and Department by October 1 of each year an electronic report regarding the activities and recommendations of the Commission, which shall be submitted for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website and the Department’s website; and

Establish priorities for programs among state agencies related to Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders and criteria to evaluate these programs.

The Department shall provide staff support to the Commission. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission, upon request.

The Commission may apply for and expend such grants, gifts, or bequests from any source as may become available in connection with its duties under this section and may comply with such conditions and requirements as may be imposed in connections therewith.

This section shall expire on July 1, 2023.

History.

2003, cc. 749, 766, § 2.2-720; 2005, cc. 633, 758; 2006, cc. 347, 381; 2009, cc. 51, 553; 2010, cc. 411, 801; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2014, cc. 434, 520; 2017, cc. 191, 469; 2020, cc. 226, 419.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 434 and 520 are identical, and in subsection G, substituted “2017” for “2014.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 469, in subdivision D 5, inserted “submitted for publication as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be” and “the General Assembly’s website and”; and substituted “2020” for “2017” in subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 226 and 419 are identical, and substituted “July 1, 2023” for “July 1, 2020” in subsection G.